Louisiana, session 2026, HB925.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2651(11)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
37:2651(11)(e) and (f) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2651. Definitions
* * *
(11)(a) "Practice of audiology" means providing or offering to provide to
individuals or groups of individuals who have or are suspected of having disorders
of the auditory system, which includes any service in audiology, including
prevention, identification, evaluation, interpretation, counseling, consultation,
habilitation, rehabilitation, instruction, supervision, or research. The practice of
audiology shall also include audiology services for disorders of the vestibular system
upon referral of a physician.
* * *
(11)(e) An audiologist is permitted to perform any of the following:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1120 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 925
(i) Order cultures and blood work testing solely as related to the auditory or
vestibular conditions in the human ear.
(ii) Order and perform in-office non-radiographic testing of the external
auditory canal solely for the evaluation of hearing and balance disorders.
(iii) Order radiographic imaging solely as related to the auditory or vestibular
conditions in the human ear.
(f) An audiologist is prohibited from performing any of the following:
(i) Surgery using an instrument including a laser, scalpel, needle, cautery,
cryoprobe, or suture, in which human tissue is cut, burned, vaporized, removed, or
otherwise permanently altered by mechanical, laser, ionizing radiation, ultrasound,
or other means.
(ii) Osseointegrated device surgery.
(iii) Cochlear implant surgery.
(iv) The preparation, operation, or performance of radiographic imaging; or
the use or interpretation of cultures, blood work testing, or radiographic imaging to
diagnose or treat patients.